Louisiana, session 2026, SB311.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:2351, 2354, 2354.1 and 2354.2 are hereby amended and reenacted
and R.S.17:2351.1, and 2354.10 through 2354.13 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2351. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Adult" means a person who has attained eighteen years of age.
(2) "Agent" means a person:
(a) Authorized to make health care decisions on behalf of the principal by a
power of attorney for health care; or
(b) Expressly authorized to make an anatomical gift on behalf of the principal
by any other record signed by the principal.
Page 1 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-439 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 311
(3) "Anatomical gift" or "gift" means a donation of all or part of a human
body to take effect after the death of the donor for the purpose of transplantation,
therapy, research, or education.
(4) "Authorization" means a legally effective expression of intent
governing acts to be undertaken after the death of the individual, including the
recovery of organs or tissue pursuant to an anatomical gift.
(5) "Consent" means a legally effective permission governing acts to be
undertaken prior to the death of the individual, including premortem
interventions, tests, procedures, or medications.
(4)(6) "Decedent" means a deceased person whose body or part is or may be
the source of an anatomical gift. The term does not include a stillborn infant and,
subject to restrictions imposed by law, a fetus.
(5)(7) "Disinterested witness" means a witness other than the spouse, child,
parent, sibling, grandchild, grandparent, or guardian of the person who makes,
amends, revokes, or refuses to make an anatomical gift, or an adult who exhibited
special care and concern for the person. The term does not include a recipient of an
anatomical gift in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 17:2353.
(6)(8) "Document of gift" means a donor card or other record used to make
an anatomical gift. The term includes a statement or symbol on a driver's license,
identification card, fishing license, hunting license, or donor registry.
(7)(9) "Donor" means a person whose body or part is the subject of an
anatomical gift.
(8)(10) "Donor registry" means a record or database maintained or
recognized by the state that contains records of legally effective authorizations to
make anatomical gifts and any amendments to or revocations thereof of an
authorization.
(9)(11) "Driver's license" means a license or permit issued by the Louisiana
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles, to operate a
vehicle, whether or not conditions are attached to the license or permit.
Page 2 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-439 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 311
(10) "Eye bank" means a person that is licensed, accredited, or regulated
under federal or state law to engage in the recovery, screening, testing, processing,
storage, or distribution of human eyes or portions of human eyes.
(11) "Fishing license" means a license or permit issued by the Louisiana
Department of Wildlife and Fisheries to fish as defined in R.S. 56:8, for a
recreational purpose as defined in R.S. 56:8.
(12) "Guardian" means a person appointed by a court to make decisions
regarding the support, care, education, health, or welfare of a person. The term does
not include a guardian ad litem.
(13) "Hospital" means a facility licensed as a hospital under the laws of any
state or a facility operated as a hospital by the United States, a state, or a subdivision
of a state.
(14) "Hunting license" means a license or permit issued by the Louisiana
Department of Wildlife and Fisheries to hunt as defined in R.S. 56:8 for a
recreational purpose as defined in R.S. 56:8.
(15) "Identification card" means a card issued by the Louisiana Department
of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles.
(16) "Know" means to have actual knowledge.
(17) "Legally effective" means having binding force under this Part and
not subject to override except as expressly provided by law.
(17)(18) "Minor" means a person who has not yet attained eighteen years of
age.
(18)(19) "Organ procurement organization" means a person designated by the
secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services as an eye
bank, organ procurement organization, or tissue bank.
(19)(20) "Parent" means a person whose parental rights have not been
terminated.
(20)(21) "Part" means an organ, an eye, or tissue of a human being. The term
does not include the whole body.
Page 3 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-439 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 311
(21)(22) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate,
trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public
corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality,
or any other legal or commercial entity.
(22)(23) "Physician" means a person authorized and licensed to practice
medicine or osteopathy under the laws of any state.
(23)(24) "Prospective donor" means a person who is dead or near death and
has been determined by a procurement organization to have a part that may be
medically suitable for transplantation, therapy, research, or education. The term does
not include a person who has made a refusal.
(24)(25) "Reasonably available" means able to be contacted by a procurement
organization without undue effort and willing and able to act in a timely manner
consistent with existing medical criteria necessary for the making of an anatomical
gift.
(25)(26) "Recipient" means a person into whose body a part of a decedent has
been or is intended to be transplanted.
(26)(27) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium
or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable
form.
(28) "Refusal" means a record created pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
17:2354.1 legally effective expression of intent not to make an anatomical gift
under this Part, including a revocation of an anatomical gift that constitutes a
refusal under R.S. 17:2354.2(B) and that expressly states an intent to bar or has
the legal effect of barring other persons from making an anatomical gift of a body
or part of a person.
(29) "Refusal registry" means a record or database maintained or
recognized by the state that records legally effective refusals to make
anatomical gifts.
(30) "Registry" means a donor registry, a refusal registry, or both,
Page 4 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-439 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 311
maintained or recognized by the state.
(28)(31) "Sign" means, with the present intent to authenticate or adopt a
record either:
(a) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol.
(b) To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol,
sound, or process.
(29)(32) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia,
Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession
subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.
(30)(33) "Technician" means any individual determined to be qualified to
remove or process parts by an appropriate organization that is licensed, accredited,
or regulated under federal or state law. The term includes an enucleator.
(31)(34) "Tissue" means a portion of the human body other than an organ or
an eye. The term does not include blood unless the blood is donated for the purpose
of research or education.
(32)(35) "Tissue bank" means a person that is licensed, accredited, or
regulated under federal or state law to engage in the recovery, screening, testing,
processing, storage, or distribution of tissue.
(33)(36) "Transplant hospital" means a hospital that furnishes organ
transplants and other medical and surgical specialty services required for the care of
transplant patients.
* * *
§2351.1. Rule of construction
A. Nothing in this Part shall be construed to permit the recovery of an
unpaired vital organ in a manner that causes or hastens the death of the donor,
or prior to death being determined in accordance with R.S. 9:111.
B. Nothing in this Part shall be construed to prohibit living organ or
tissue donation that does not result in the death of the donor and is otherwise
authorized by law.
Page 5 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-439 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 311
C. Unless expressly provided by law, authorization to make an
anatomical gift after death shall not be construed as consent to any act
undertaken prior to death.
* * *
§2354. Manner of executing anatomical gift prior to death of donor
A. A donor may make an anatomical gift An anatomical gift may be made
by an individual who is at least eighteen years of age or older who is otherwise
authorized by law to make health care decisions for himself or herself by any of
the following methods:
(1) Authorizing By a document of gift signed by the donor, including
authorization of a statement or symbol indicating that the donor has made an
anatomical gift to be imprinted on his on a driver's license, identification card,
fishing license, or hunting license, or donor registry, as provided by law.
(2) Executing a will.
(3) Any form of communication addressed to at least two adults, at least one
of whom is a disinterested witness, during a terminal illness or injury. By a
document of gift signed by another individual acting at the direction of the
donor if the donor is physically unable to sign, provided the document is
witnessed by two adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested witness, and
states that it was signed and witnessed as provided in this Paragraph.
(4) By an oral communication made during a terminal illness or injury,
recorded or contemporaneously reduced to writing and signed by the individual
receiving the communication, in accordance with this Section.
B. A donor or other person authorized to make an anatomical gift pursuant
to R.S. 17:2352 may make a gift by a donor card or other record signed by the person
making the gift or by authorizing that a statement or symbol indicating that a gift has
been made be included on a donor registry . If the donor or other person is physically
unable to sign a record, the record may be signed by another person at the direction
of the person making the gift and the record shall:
Page 6 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-439 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 311
(1) Be witnessed by two adults, one of whom is a disinterested witness, who
have signed at the request of the person making the gift; and
(2) State that it has been signed and witnessed as provided in Paragraph (1)
of this Subsection.
B. A refusal to make an anatomical gift may be executed in the same
manner and with the same legal effect as an anatomical gift under Subsection
A of this Section.
C. An anatomical gift or refusal executed in accordance with this Section
constitutes a legally effective expression of the donor's intent and shall be given
effect in accordance with this Part. A gift or refusal shall not be revoked,
amended, or overridden except as expressly provided by law.
C.D. Revocation, suspension, expiration, or cancellation of a driver's license,
identification card, fishing license, or hunting license upon which an anatomical gift
is indicated does not invalidate the gift.
D.E. An anatomical gift executed in a will takes effect upon the death of the
donor whether or not the will is probated. Invalidation of the will after the death of
the donor does not invalidate the gift.
§2354.1. Refusal to make anatomical gift; effect
A. A person An individual may refuse to make an anatomical gift of his the
individual's body or part by executing any of the following: a refusal in any
manner authorized for the execution of an anatomical gift under R.S. 17:2354.
(1) A signed record in accordance with Subsection B of this Section or if he
is physically unable to sign, another person acting at the direction of the person shall
sign.
(2) A will and testament, whether or not the will is admitted to probate or
invalidated after his death.
(3) Any form of communication made by the person during a terminal illness
or injury addressed to at least two adults, one of whom is a disinterested witness.
B. A signed record, shall be witnessed by at least two adults, one of whom
Page 7 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-439 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 311
is a disinterested witness, and shall state that it has been signed and witnessed as
provided in Subsection A of this Section.
B. A refusal executed pursuant to this Section shall be subject to the
same requirements regarding form, signature, witnesses, authentication, and
recording as apply to the execution of an anatomical gift under R.S. 17:2354.
C. A person who has made a refusal to make an anatomical gift, may amend
or revoke the refusal in any of the following ways:
(1) In the manner provided in Subsection A of this Section for making a
refusal.
(2) By subsequently making an anatomical gift in accordance with R.S.
17:2354 that is inconsistent with the refusal.
(3) By destroying or canceling the record or a portion thereof evidencing the
refusal, with the intent of revocation.
C. A refusal executed in accordance with this Section constitutes a legally
effective expression of the individual's intent and shall be given full force and
effect under this Part.
D. Except as otherwise provided in R.S. 17:2354.2, in the absence of an
express contrary indication set forth in the refusal, an unrevoked refusal bars all
other persons from making an anatomical gift of the body or part of the person
individual.
E. A refusal may be amended or revoked only in the manner provided
in R.S. 17:2356.
F. A refusal may include limitations or special instructions, which shall
be honored to the extent permitted by law.
§2354.2. Preclusive effect of anatomical gift; amendment; revocation
A. Except as otherwise provided in Subsection G of this Section and subject
Subject to Subsection F of this Section, in the absence of an express, contrary
indication by the donor, a person other than the donor is barred from making,
amending, or revoking an anatomical gift of the body or part of the donor if the gift
Page 8 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-439 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 311
complies with R.S. 17:2354 or 2356 was executed in accordance with R.S. 17:2354
and has not been amended or revoked in accordance with R.S. 17:2356.
B. A revocation of a an anatomical gift in accordance with R.S. 17:2356 is
not constitutes a refusal and does not bar another for purposes of this Part and
bars any other person from making an anatomical gift of the body or part of the
donor unless the donor subsequently authorizes a new anatomical gift in
accordance with this Part law.
C. If a person other than the donor makes an unrevoked anatomical gift of the
body or part or of the donor in accordance with R.S. 17:2354 or amends a gift of the
body or part of the donor in accordance with R.S. 17:2356, another person may not
make, amend, or revoke the gift, in accordance with R.S. 17:2356.
D. A revocation of an anatomical gift of the body or part of a donor in
accordance with R.S. 17:2356 by a person other than the donor does not bar another
person from making an anatomical gift of the body or part in accordance with R.S.
17:2354 or 2356 from amending or revoking donor intent in accordance with
R.S. 17:2356, as applicable.
E. In the absence of an express, contrary indication by the donor or other
person authorized to make an anatomical gift, an anatomical gift of a part is neither
a refusal to give another part nor a limitation on the making of a gift of another part
at a later time by the donor or another person.
F. In the absence of an express, contrary indication by the donor or other
person authorized to make an anatomical gift, an anatomical gift of a part for one or
more of the purposes in R.S. 17:2352 is not a limitation on the making of an
anatomical gift of the part for any other purpose in accordance with R.S. 17:2354 or
2356.
G. If an unemancipated minor donor dies, his reasonably available parent
may revoke or amend the anatomical gift.
* * *
§2354.10. Anatomical gifts by minors
Page 9 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-439 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 311
A. No state agency, political subdivision, department, office, or
contractor thereof, including the office responsible for the issuance of driver's
licenses or identification cards, shall solicit, query, or request from a minor any
authorization for or refusal to make an anatomical gift in the absence of a
parent or legal guardian.
B. No representation by a minor concerning anatomical gift
authorization or refusal shall be recorded, relied upon, or given legal effect
unless made in the presence of a parent or legal guardian who affirmatively and
expressly concurs in writing in the decision of the minor.
C. Any representation made by a minor concerning an anatomical gift
authorization or refusal, when made in the presence of and with the affirmative
and express written concurrence of a parent or legal guardian, may be recorded
solely for informational purposes and shall not be legally operative prior to the
minor attaining the age of majority.
D. Upon attainment of the age of majority, any informational record of
anatomical gift authorization or refusal made by the individual as a minor in
accordance with this Section shall become legally operative unless the individual
affirmatively amends or revokes the record in accordance with law.
E. This Section shall not apply to a minor who is emancipated pursuant
to law or who is legally married, and the individual shall be treated as an adult
for purposes of this Part.
F. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit the authority of a
parent or legal guardian to make or refuse an anatomical gift on behalf of a
minor as otherwise provided by law.
§2354.11. Premortem interventions; definitions; prohibitions
A. Definitions.
For purposes of this Section:
(1) "Donation after circulatory death" or "DCD" means the recovery of
organs or tissue for transplantation following the determination of death based
Page 10 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-439 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 311
on irreversible cessation of circulatory and respiratory functions in accordance
with R.S. 9:111.
(2) "Donation after brain death" or "DBD" means the recovery of
organs or tissue for transplantation following the determination of death based
on irreversible cessation of all functions of the entire brain, including the brain
stem, in accordance with R.S. 9:111.
(3) "Premortem intervention" means any medical procedure, test,
medication, cannulation, or other intervention undertaken prior to the
determination of death for the purpose of facilitating organ or tissue recovery.
B. General rule. No premortem intervention shall be performed unless
it is medically indicated for the direct benefit of the patient or is performed
pursuant to a legally effective consent applicable to premortem interventions,
as provided in this Section.
C. Prohibited acts. Regardless of consent, no person shall perform or
direct any premortem intervention that has a material likelihood of any of the
following:
(1) Hastening death.
(2) Manufacturing, accelerating, or securing irreversibility of
circulatory, respiratory, or neurologic cessation.
(3) Preventing or materially interfering with the restoration or
resumption of circulatory, respiratory, or neurologic function.
D. Separation of functions. Any physician or individual who performs
or directs a premortem intervention shall be independent of, and shall not
participate in, the recovery or transplantation of any organ or tissue from the
individual, and shall not be a member of the transplant team.
E. Disclosure and consent. Authorization to make an anatomical gift
after death does not constitute consent to any premortem intervention, test,
procedure, or medication. Consent for any premortem intervention shall be
separately and expressly obtained and shall be legally effective only if the
Page 11 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-439 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 311
following occur:
(1) The consent is given by the patient, or by another person legally
authorized under Louisiana law to consent to medical treatment on behalf of the
patient.
(2) The consent is voluntary and informed.
(3) The nature and purpose of the premortem intervention are
specifically described.
(4) The patient or other person authorized to consent is informed that
the intervention is performed for the purpose of facilitating organ or tissue
recovery and is not medically indicated for the care or treatment of the patient.
(5) The consent does not authorize any premortem intervention that
poses a material risk of causing or hastening the death of the patient, or a
material risk of interfering with the determination of death in accordance with
R.S. 9:111.
F. Construction. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to alter the
standards for determination of death under R.S. 9:111 or to authorize any
practice inconsistent with that Section.
§2354.12. Post-determination handling and transport of the decedent
A. Applicability. This Section applies following the determination and
pronouncement of death under R.S. 9:111 and the recovery of any organ or
tissue pursuant to an anatomical gift.
B. Disclosure of post-recovery handling. Prior to the recovery of organs
or tissue, the individual authorized to make an anatomical gift, or the
individual's authorized representative where applicable, shall be informed in
writing of any plan to do any of the following:
(1) Transport the decedent from the hospital or facility where death was
determined to another facility for further organ or tissue recovery, processing,
or handling.
(2) Continue mechanical ventilation, perfusion, or other artificial
Page 12 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-439 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 311
support of bodily functions following the determination of death for purposes
related to organ or tissue recovery.
C. Authorization required. No transport or continuation of mechanical
support described in Subsection B of this Section shall occur unless expressly
authorized as part of a legally effective authorization applicable to
post-determination handling and transport.
D. Scope of authorization. Authorization to make an anatomical gift
after death shall not, by itself, constitute authorization for transport of the
decedent to a nonhospital facility or for continuation of mechanical support
following death determination.
E. Dignity and transparency. Any handling or transport of the decedent
following death determination and organ or tissue recovery shall be conducted
in a manner consistent with the dignity of the decedent and with the reasonable
expectations of the family, as informed by the disclosures made under this
Section.
F. Construction. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit the
recovery of organs or tissue otherwise authorized by law, to alter the standards
for determination of death under R.S. 9:111, or, except to the extent necessary
to carry out a valid anatomical gift, to alter or transfer the custodial authority
of the person or persons authorized by law to control disposition of the body.
§2354.13. Limited judicial review
A. Standing. A petition for judicial review under this Section may be
brought only by one of the following persons:
(1) The individual who executed the authorization, refusal, or consent,
if living.
(2) A person authorized by law to make or refuse an anatomical gift or
to provide consent on behalf of the individual.
B. Scope of review. Judicial review under this Section shall be limited to
determining whether an act or omission materially violates this Part or a legally
Page 13 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-439 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 311
effective authorization, refusal, or consent executed pursuant to this Part.
Judicial review under this Section is limited to ensuring compliance with this
Part and with legally effective authorizations, refusals, and consents, and is not
intended to expand, modify, or supplant rights, obligations, or discretionary
judgments established by law.
C. Expedited proceedings. Upon a showing that irreparable harm may
occur in the absence of prompt judicial intervention, the court may conduct
expedited proceedings, including summary hearings, and may issue temporary
or preliminary orders as required.
D. Deference to legally effective intent. In any proceeding under this
Section, the court shall give effect to a legally effective authorization, refusal, or
consent, and shall not substitute its judgment for that expressed intent except
as expressly provided by law.
E. Remedies. The court may grant declaratory or injunctive relief
narrowly tailored to enforce compliance with this Part. Monetary damages shall
not be awarded under this Section.
F. Construction. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to do any of
the following:
(1) Create a private right of action for damages.
(2) Expand the scope of judicial review beyond that expressly provided
herein.
(3) Delay or impede lawful organ or tissue recovery authorized under
this Part absent a material violation.
G. Proceedings under this Section shall be construed consistently with
principles governing expedited injunctive relief under Louisiana law.
H. Any appellate review of an order issued under this Section shall be
conducted in accordance with applicable law, shall be limited to the scope of
review set forth in this Section, and shall be expedited in recognition of the
time-sensitive nature of matters arising under this Part.
Page 14 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-439 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 311
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027; if vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on
the day following such approval by the legislature or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.